Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.120

Out-of-state licensees—Application—Fee—Temporary assignment.

(1) Any person from another state that the director determines has selection, training, and other requirements at least equal to those required by this chapter, and who holds a valid license, registration, identification, or similar card issued by the other state, may apply for a private security guard license card or armed private security guard license card on a form prescribed by the director. Upon receipt of a processing fee to be determined by the director, the director shall issue the individual a private security guard license card or armed private security guard license card.

(2) A valid private security guard license, registration, identification, or similar card issued by any other state of the United States is valid in this state for a period of ninety days, but only if the licensee is on temporary assignment as a private security guard for the same employer that employs the licensee in the state in which he or she is a permanent resident.

(3) A person from another state on temporary assignment in Washington may not solicit business in this state or represent himself or herself as licensed in this state.

[ 1995 c 277 s 9; 1991 c 334 s 12.]